test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_VINIT_iiyaw_gt-norm.yaml
     iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhiniibaning
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhiniibanan
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhiniibanag
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensinaanibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensinaanibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensinaanibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensinaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawensiniibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawensiniibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawensiniibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiyawimishinaaniban
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiyawimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iiyawimishiniiban
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iiyawimishini***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iiyawimishiwaaiban
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iiyawimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iiyawimishinaaning
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iiyawimishinaanan
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iiyawimishinaanag
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iiyawimishiniing
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iiyawimishinian
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iiyawimishiniag
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iiyawimishiwaaing
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iiyawimishiwaaan
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iiyawimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iiyawimishibaning
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iiyawimishibanan
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iiyawimishibanag
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iiyawimish***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iiyawimish***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iiyawimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawiminaanibaning
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawiminaanibanan
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawiminaanibanag
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawiminiibaning
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawiminiibanan
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawiminiibanag
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawimini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawimini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawimini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawimiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawimiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawimiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawishinaanibaning
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawishinaanibanan
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawishinaanibanag
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawishinaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawishiniibaning
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawishiniibanan
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawishiniibanag
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawishini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawishini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawishini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawishiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawishiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawishiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niiiyawenhimishinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niiiyawenhimishini
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niiiyawenhimishiwaa
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: niiiyawensimishinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: niiiyawensimishini
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: niiiyawensimishiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giiiyawenhimishinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giiiyawenhimishini
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giiiyawenhimishiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: giiiyawensimishinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: giiiyawensimishini
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: giiiyawensimishiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oiiyawenhimishinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oiiyawenhimishini
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oiiyawenhimishiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: oiiyawensimishinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: oiiyawensimishini
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: oiiyawensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iiiyawenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iiiyawenhimishini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iiiyawenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: iiiyawensimishinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: iiiyawensimishini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: iiiyawensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: niiiyawenhimishiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niiiyawenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: niiiyawensimishiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: niiiyawensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: giiiyawenhimishiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giiiyawenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: giiiyawensimishiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: giiiyawensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: oiiyawenhimishiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oiiyawenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: oiiyawensimishiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: oiiyawensimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: iiiyawenhimishiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: iiiyawenhimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: iiiyawensimishiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: iiiyawensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: niiiyawenhimishing
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: niiiyawenhimishan
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: niiiyawenhimishag
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: niiiyawensimishing
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: niiiyawensimishan
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: niiiyawensimishag
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: giiiyawenhimishing
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: giiiyawenhimishan
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: giiiyawenhimishag
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: giiiyawensimishing
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: giiiyawensimishan
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: giiiyawensimishag
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: oiiyawenhimishing
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: oiiyawenhimishan
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: oiiyawenhimishag
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: oiiyawensimishing
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: oiiyawensimishan
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: oiiyawensimishag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: iiiyawenhimishing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: iiiyawenhimishan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: iiiyawenhimishag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: iiiyawensimishing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: iiiyawensimishan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: iiiyawensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niiiyawenhiminaaniban
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niiiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: niiiyawenhiminiiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: niiiyawenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niiiyawenhimiwaaiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: niiiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: niiiyawensiminaaniban
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niiiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: niiiyawensiminiiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: niiiyawensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: niiiyawensimiwaaiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: niiiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: giiiyawenhiminaaniban
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giiiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: giiiyawenhiminiiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: giiiyawenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: giiiyawenhimiwaaiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: giiiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: giiiyawensiminaaniban
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giiiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: giiiyawensiminiiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: giiiyawensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: giiiyawensimiwaaiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: giiiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oiiyawenhiminaaniban
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oiiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oiiyawenhiminiiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oiiyawenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oiiyawenhimiwaaiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oiiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: oiiyawensiminaaniban
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oiiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: oiiyawensiminiiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: oiiyawensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: oiiyawensimiwaaiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: oiiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiiyawenhiminaaniban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: iiiyawenhiminiiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: iiiyawenhimini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: iiiyawenhimiwaaiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: iiiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiiyawensiminaaniban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: iiiyawensiminiiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: iiiyawensimini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: iiiyawensimiwaaiban
